Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 9

Initiatives, Referenda, and Constitutional Amendments

Subchapter 1

— Petition and Election Procedure

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Through Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, the people of Arkansas have reserved to themselves the power to propose legislative measures, laws, and amendments to the Arkansas Constitution and to enact or reject the proposed measures, laws, and amendments at the polls independently of the General Assembly;

“(2)

The citizens of this state have an expectation that their right of initiative and referendum will be respected and that the process of gathering signatures of registered voters will be free of fraud, forgery, and other illegal conduct by sponsors, canvassers, notaries, and petitioners;

“(3)

Sponsors and paid canvassers may have an incentive to knowingly submit forged or otherwise invalid signatures in order to obtain additional time to gather signatures and submit supplemental petitions;

“(4)

In 2012, sponsors of four (4) separate initiative petitions submitted petitions to the Secretary of State containing over two hundred ninety-eight thousand (298,000) purported signatures of registered voters;

“(5)

Of the four petitions submitted, none had an initial validity rate in excess of fifty-six percent (56%), and three (3) of the petitions had an initial validity rate below thirty-one percent (31%); and

“(6)

Of the three petitions with the lowest initial validity rate, there were widespread instances of apparent fraud, forgery, and false statements in the signature-gathering process.

“(b)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if an effort is not made to address these issues:

“(1)

Untrained paid canvassers will continue to obtain and submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures; and

“(2)

Unscrupulous sponsors and canvassers will continue to have an incentive to submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures and make false statements to the Secretary of State.

“(c)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if this act becomes law:

“(1)

Sponsors and canvassers of proposed initiative measures will be held more accountable for their actions in gathering signatures from registered voters; and

“(2)

The earlier determination of the insufficiency of petitions rife with false statements, forged signatures, and otherwise facially invalid signatures will result in less confusion and frustration with the initiative process.

“(d)

For the reasons stated in this section, the General Assembly finds that passage of this act will make sponsors and canvassers more accountable to the people of this state, facilitate the initiative process, conserve state resources, and help to restore the confidence and trust of the people in the initiative process.”

Preambles.

Acts 1933, No. 71 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, there is considerable confusion with reference to the numbers by which the several amendments to the Constitution of Arkansas should be designated, and the names and numbers by which initiated and referred acts should be designated on the ballots;

“Now, therefore … .”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 17: effective on passage.

Acts 1913, No. 135, § 13: Approved Mar. 6, 1913. Emergency declared.

Acts 1933, No. 71, § 3: approved Mar. 3, 1933. Emergency clause provided: “It being necessary for the welfare of the state that in all matters affecting amendments to the Constitution, and the measures to be voted on by the people, there should be definiteness and certainty with reference to the amendment or measure affected, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1989, No. 280, § 10: Mar. 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of this State that in order to facilitate the operation of Amendment 7 to the Constitution of Arkansas it is immediately necessary to simplify the process of obtaining signatures on public initiative petitions, allow for the option of binding review by the Arkansas Supreme Court of the popular name and ballot title of public initiatives substantially prior to the date when signatures on such petitions must be filed with the Secretary of State, and provide assistance to the Secretary of State with respect to verification of signatures on such petitions. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 22: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that existing procedures for initiating and referring state laws and ordinances pursuant to Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution and state statutes are inadequate to prevent fraudulent practices by sponsors and canvassers in obtaining ballot access; that this act addresses these inadequacies; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent fraudulent practices because petition campaigns are either being conducted at the present time or may be conducted immediately upon the adjournment of the General Assembly with respect to either initiated or referred measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 376, § 14: Mar. 8, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act amends the process for circulating initiative petitions and referendum petitions; and that the provisions of this act should become effective immediately so that its provisions apply to all petitions circulated after the passage of the act to avoid confusion in petition circulation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”. The emergency clause for Acts 2019, No. 376 was held to be defective in Safe Surgery Ark. v. Thurston, 2019 Ark. 403.

Acts 2019, No. 898, § 16: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2019 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2019 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

7-9-101. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Act” means an act having general application throughout the state, whether originating in the General Assembly or proposed by the people;

(2)

“Amendment” means an amendment to the Arkansas Constitution that is proposed by the people;

(3)

“Canvasser” means a person who circulates an initiative or referendum petition or a part or parts of an initiative or referendum petition to obtain the signatures of petitioners thereto;

(4)

“Election” means a regular general election at which state and county officers are elected for regular terms;

(5)

“Measure” means an amendment, an act, or an ordinance;

(6)

“Ordinance” means an ordinance of a municipality or county, whether originating in the legislative body of the municipality or county or proposed by the people;

(7)

“Petition part” means a petition signature sheet containing the information required under §7-9-104 or §7-9-105;

(8)

“Petitioner” means a person who signs an initiative or referendum petition ordering a vote on a measure;

(9)

“Registered voter” means a person who is registered at the time of signing the petition pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51; and

(10)

“Sponsor” means a person who arranges for the circulation of an initiative or referendum petition or who files an initiative or referendum petition with the official charged with verifying the signatures.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-201; Acts 1997, No. 646, § 1; 2013, No. 1413, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “and referred acts” at the end of (1); in (2), substituted “an” for “any proposed”, “that is” for “whether”, and deleted “General Assembly or by the” preceding “people”; deleted (5) and redesignated former (6) as present (5); rewrote present (5), (8), and (10); inserted (6), (7) and (9) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

7-9-102. Duties of election officers — Penalty for failure to perform.

(a)(1)

The duties imposed by this act upon members of the State Board of Election Commissioners and county boards of election commissioners, election officials, and all other officers expressly named in this act are declared to be mandatory.

(2)

These duties shall be performed in good faith within the time and in the manner provided.

(b)(1)

If any member of any board, any election official, or any other officer so charged with the duty shall knowingly and willfully fail or refuse to perform his or her duty or shall knowingly and willfully commit a fraud in evading the performance of his or her duty, then he or she shall be guilty of a violation.

(2)

Upon conviction, he or she shall be fined any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and also shall be removed from office.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-223; Acts 1997, No. 646, § 2; 2005, No. 1994, § 74.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1943, No. 195, codified as §§7-9-101 —7-9-103,7-9-107,7-9-108,7-9-111 —7-9-113,7-9-115 —7-9-119,7-9-121,7-9-123.

7-9-103. Signing of petition — Penalty for falsification — Notice of suspected forgery.

(a)(1)(A)

A person who is a registered voter of this state may sign his or her own name and print his or her own name, address, birth date, and the date of signing on an initiative or referendum petition in his or her own proper handwriting, and not otherwise, to order an initiative or referendum vote upon a proposed amendment or a proposed or referred act.

(B)

If a person signing a petition under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section requires assistance due to disability, another person:

(i)

May print the name, address, birth date, and the date of signing; and

(ii)

Shall sign and print his or her name in the margin of the petition.

(2)(A)

A person who is a registered voter of a municipality or county of this state may sign his or her own name and print his or her own name, address, birth date, and the date of signing on an initiative or referendum petition in his or her own proper handwriting, and not otherwise, to order an initiative or referendum vote upon a proposed or referred ordinance.

(B)

If a person signing a petition under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section requires assistance due to disability, another person:

(i)

May print the name, address, birth date, and the date of signing; and

(ii)

Shall sign and print his or her name in the margin of the petition.

(3)

A person who is under eighteen (18) years of age shall not act as a canvasser.

(4)

A person shall not act as a paid canvasser on a statewide initiative or referendum petition if the sponsor has not provided the information required under §7-9-601 to the Secretary of State before the person solicits signatures on a petition.

(b)

A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if the person knowingly:

(1)

Signs a name other than his or her own name to a petition;

(2)

Signs his or her name more than one (1) time to a petition;

(3)

Signs a petition when he or she is not legally entitled to sign the petition;

(4)

Prints a name, address, or birth date other than his or her own on a petition unless the signer requires assistance due to disability and the person complies with this section; or

(5)

Prints the date of signing for another person unless the signer requires assistance due to disability and the person complies with this section.

(c)

A person commits a Class A misdemeanor if the person, acting as a canvasser, notary, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor:

(1)

Signs a name other than his or her own to a petition;

(2)

Prints a name, address, or birth date other than his or her own on a petition unless the signer requires assistance due to disability and the person complies with this section;

(3)

Solicits or obtains a signature to a petition knowing that the person signing is not qualified to sign the petition;

(4)

Knowingly pays a person any form of compensation in exchange for signing a petition as a petitioner;

(5)

Accepts or pays money or anything of value for obtaining signatures on a petition when the person acting as a canvasser, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor knows that the person acting as canvasser's name or address is not included on the sponsor's list filed with the Secretary of State under §7-9-601;

(6)

Knowingly misrepresents the purpose and effect of the petition or the measure affected for the purpose of causing a person to sign a petition;

(7)

As a canvasser, knowingly makes a false statement on a petition verification form;

(8)

As a notary, fails to witness a canvasser's affidavit by witnessing the signing of the instrument in person and either personally knowing the signer or being presented with proof of identity of the signer; or

(9)

As a sponsor, files a petition part with the official charged with verifying the signatures knowing that the petition part contains one (1) or more false or fraudulent signatures unless each false or fraudulent signature is clearly stricken by the sponsor before filing.

(d)

When the official charged with verifying the signatures has reasonable grounds to believe that one (1) or more signatures on a petition is forged, the official shall report the suspected forgery and basis for suspecting forgery to:

(1)

The Division of Arkansas State Police, in the case of a statewide petition; or

(2)

The prosecuting attorney of the county, in the case of a local petition.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 135, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 7505; Pope's Dig., § 9564; Acts 1943, No. 195, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-202, 2-401; Acts 1991, No. 719, § 1; 1997, No. 646, § 3; 2013, No. 1413, § 3; 2013, No. 1432, §
10; 2015, No. 1219, § 1; 2019, No. 376, §§ 3, 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Former subdivisions (b)(6) through (8) of this section were also amended by Acts 2013, No. 1413, §
3, prior to the repeal of former subdivision (b) by Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
10, which read:

“(6)

Knowingly misrepresents the purpose and effect of the petition or the measure affected for the purpose of causing a person to sign a petition;

“(7)

As a canvasser, knowingly makes a false statement on a petition verification form;

“(8)

As a notary, knowingly fails to witness a canvasser's affidavit by witnessing the signing of the instrument in person and either personally knowing the signer or by being presented with proof of the identity of the signer; or”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1413 rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1432 repealed former (b).

The 2015 amendment inserted present (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and inserted (c)(6) through (c)(8) and redesignated former (c)(6) as (c)(9).

The 2019 amendment added (b)(4) and (b)(5); and deleted “excluding signatures apparently signed by one (1) spouse for another” following “petition is forged” in the introductory language of (d).

Cross References.

Criminal impersonation, §5-37-208.

Forgery, §5-37-201.

7-9-104. Form of initiative petition — Sufficiency of signatures.

(a)

The petition for an ordinance, act, or amendment proposed by initiative shall be on substantially the following form:

“INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable
Secretary of State of the State of Arkansas, or County Clerk, or City Clerk We, the undersigned registered voters of the State of Arkansas, or
County, Arkansas, or City of
, or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas (as the case may be), respectfully propose the following amendment to the Constitution of the State or act or ordinance (as the case may be), and by this, our petition, order that the same be submitted to the people of said state, or county, or municipality (as the case may be), to the end that the same may be adopted, enacted, or rejected by the vote of the registered voters of said (state, county, or municipality) at the regular general election to be held on the
day of
, 20 , and each of us for himself or herself says:
I have personally signed this petition; I am a registered voter of the State of Arkansas, or
County, Arkansas, or City of
, or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas (as the case may be), and my printed name, date of birth, residence, city or town of residence, and date of signing this petition are correctly written after my signature. (Here insert popular name and ballot title of initiated measure.) (In the case of a proposed initiated act or ordinance, insert the following: BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS, OR
COUNTY, ARKANSAS, OR CITY OF
OR INCORPORATED TOWN OF , ARKANSAS (as the case may be)): (Here insert full text of initiated measure.)”

Click to view form.

(b)

No additional sheets of voter signatures shall be attached to any petition unless the sheets contain the full language of the petition.

(c)(1)

The signature section of the petition shall be formatted and shall contain the number of signature lines prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(2)

Before the circulation of a statewide petition for signatures, the sponsor shall file a printed petition part with the Secretary of State in the exact form that will be used for obtaining signatures.

History.

Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 9761; Pope's Dig., § 13285; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-203; Acts 1989, No. 280, § 1; 1991, No. 42, § 1; 1997, No. 646, § 4; 2001, No. 789, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 23; 2013, No. 1413, §§ 4, 5; 2019, No. 376, § 5.

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const., Amend. 7, which amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 1, repealed Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2 to the extent of any conflict therewith.

Municipalities may provide for initiative and referendum as to their local legislation, see Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), substituted “act” for “law”, “registered” for “legal”, or similar language throughout, deleted “to wit: Here insert title and full text of measure proposed” following “(as the case may be)”, and deleted “in said” following “election to be held” and inserted “or
County, Arkansas, or City of
, or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas (as the case may be),” and the final two paragraphs; and added (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted former (b), and redesignated former (c) and (d) as (b) and (c).

7-9-105. Form of referendum petition — Sufficiency of signatures.

(a)

The petition and order of referendum for an ordinance or act shall be on substantially the following form:

“REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable
Secretary of State of the State of Arkansas, or County Clerk, or City Clerk We, the undersigned registered voters of the State of Arkansas, or
County, Arkansas, or City or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas, (as the case may be) respectfully order by this, our petition, that Act No.
of the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas, approved on the
day of
, 20 , entitled ‘An Act
’ or Ordinance No.
, passed by the county quorum court, the city (or town) council of the City (or Incorporated Town), or County of
, Arkansas, on the
day of
, 20 , entitled, ‘An Ordinance
,’ be referred to the people of said state, county, or municipality (as the case may be), to the end that the same may be approved or rejected by the vote of the registered voters of the state, or of said county or municipality (as the case may be) at the biennial (or annual, as the case may be, if a city ordinance) regular general election (or at a special election, as the case may be) to be held on the
day of
, 20 ; and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am a registered voter of the State of Arkansas, or
County, Arkansas, or City of
, or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas (as the case may be), and my printed name, date of birth, residence, city or town of residence, and date of signing this petition are correctly written after my signature. (Here insert popular name and ballot title of referred measure.) REFERRED TO THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS, OR
COUNTY, ARKANSAS,
OR CITY OF
OR INCORPORATED TOWN OF
, ARKANSAS (as the case may
be): (Here insert full text of referred measure.)”.

Click to view form.

(b)

The information provided by the person on the petition may be used as evidence of the validity or invalidity of the signature. However, if a signature of a registered voter on the petition is sufficient to verify the voter's name, then it shall not be adjudged invalid for failure to sign the name or write the residence and city or town of residence exactly as it appears on voter registration records, for failure to print the name in the space provided, for failure to provide the correct date of birth, nor for failure to provide the correct date of signing the petition, all of that information being an aid to verification rather than a mandatory requirement to perfect the validity of the signature.

(c)

No additional sheets of voter signatures shall be attached to any petition unless the sheets contain the full language of the petition.

(d)(1)

The signature section of the petition shall be formatted and shall contain the number of signature lines as prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(2)

Before the circulation of a statewide petition for signatures, the sponsor shall file a printed petition part with the Secretary of State in the exact form that will be used for obtaining signatures.

History.

Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 9766; Pope's Dig., § 13287; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-204; Acts 1989, No. 280, § 2; 1991, No. 42, § 2; 1997, No. 646, § 5; 2001, No. 790, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 24; 2013, No. 1413, §§ 6, 7.

Publisher's Notes.

This section, insofar as it related to municipalities, was superseded by Acts 1913, No. 135 which was subsequently superseded by Ark. Const., Amend. 7.

Ark. Const. Amend. 7, which amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 1, repealed Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2 to the extent of any conflict therewith.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), inserted “for an ordinance or act” in the first sentence, “or
County, Arkansas, or City of
, or Incorporated Town of
, Arkansas (as the case may be)” and the final two paragraphs; substituted “REFERRENDUM PETITION” for “PETITION FOR REFERENDUM” and “registered” for “legal” throughout; and added (d).

7-9-106. Required attachments to petitions.

(a)

To every petition for the initiative shall be attached a full and correct copy of the title and the measure proposed.

(b)

To every petition for the referendum shall be attached a full and correct copy of the measure on which the referendum is ordered.

History.

Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 9768; Pope's Dig., § 13288; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-205.

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const., Amend. 7, which amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 1, repealed Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2 to the extent of any conflict therewith.

7-9-107. Filing of original draft before circulation.

(a)

Before any initiative petition or referendum petition ordering a vote upon any amendment or act shall be circulated for obtaining signatures of petitioners, the sponsors shall file the original draft with the Secretary of State.

(b)

The original draft shall include:

(1)

The full text of the proposed measure;

(2)

A ballot title for the proposed measure; and

(3)

A popular name for the proposed measure.

(c)

The Secretary of State shall return to the sponsor a file-marked copy of the original draft that shall serve as evidence that the original draft was filed in compliance with this section.

(d)

The sponsor may begin circulating an initiative petition or referendum petition upon receipt of the file-marked copy under subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 4; 1977, No. 208, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-208; Acts 1989, No. 280, § 3; 1989, No. 912, § 6; 2013, No. 1413, §§ 8, 9; 2019, No. 376, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (d), substituted “the Attorney General’s” for “his or her” and “the sponsors” for “they”; and repealed (e) and (f).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section heading; in (a), inserted the first occurrence of “petition”, substituted “file” for “submit”, and substituted “with the Secretary of State” for “to the Attorney General, with a proposed legislative or ballot title and popular name”; and rewrote (b) through (d).

7-9-108. Procedure for circulation of petition.

(a)

Each initiative or referendum petition ordering a vote upon a measure having general application throughout the state shall be prepared and circulated in fifteen (15) or more parts or counterparts, and each shall be an exact copy or counterpart of all other such parts upon which signatures of petitioners are to be solicited. When a sufficient number of parts are signed by a requisite number of qualified electors and are filed and duly certified by the Secretary of State, they shall be treated and considered as one (1) petition.

(b)

Each part of a petition shall have attached thereto the affidavit of the canvasser to the effect that the canvasser's current residence address appearing on the verification is correct, that all signatures appearing on the petition part were made in the presence of the affiant, and that to the best of the affiant's knowledge and belief each signature is genuine and each person signing is a registered voter.

(c)

Preceding every petition, there shall be set out in boldface type, over the signature of the Attorney General, any instructions to canvassers and signers as may appear proper and beneficial informing them of the privileges granted by the Arkansas Constitution and of the penalties imposed for violations of this act. The instructions on penalties shall be in larger type than the other instructions.

(d)

No part of any initiative or referendum petition shall contain signatures of petitioners from more than one (1) county.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-206; Acts 1991, No. 719, § 2; 2013, No. 1413, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (b), substituted “canvasser to the effect that the canvasser’s current residence address appearing on the verification is correct” for “person who circulated the petition to the effect that”, “on the petition part” for “thereon”, “each person” for “that the person so”, and “registered” for “legal”.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §7-9-102.

7-9-109. Form of verification — Penalty for false statement.

(a)

Each petition containing signatures shall be verified in substantially the following form by the canvasser's affidavit thereon as a part thereof:

“State of Arkansas County of
I,
(print name of canvasser) , being duly sworn, state that each of the foregoing persons signed his or her own name to this sheet of the petition in my presence. To the best of my knowledge and belief, each signature is genuine and each signer is a registered voter of the State of Arkansas,
County, or City or Incorporated Town of
. At all times during the circulation of this signature sheet, an exact copy of the popular name, ballot title, and text was attached to the signature sheet. My current residence address is correctly stated below. Signature
Current residence
Indicate one:
Paid Canvasser
Volunteer/Unpaid Canvasser Subscribed and sworn to before me this
day of
, 20 Signature
Clerk, Notary, Judge, or J.P. Seal

Click to view form.

(b)

Forms herein given are not mandatory, and if substantially followed in any petition it shall be sufficient, disregarding clerical and merely technical errors.

(c)(1)

Petitions shall not be disqualified due to clerical or technical errors made by a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace when verifying the canvasser's signature.

(2)

Petitions shall not be disqualified for failure of a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace to sign exactly as his or her name appears on his or her seal if the signature of a clerk, notary, judge, or justice of the peace is sufficient to verify his or her name.

(d)

A canvasser who knowingly makes a false statement on a petition verification form required by this section shall be deemed guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 9769; Pope's Dig., § 13289; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-207; Acts 1989, No. 280, § 4; 1991, No. 42, § 3; 1991, No. 197, § 1; 1997, No. 646, § 6; 2005, No. 1817, § 1;
2013, No. 1413, § 11; 2019, No. 376, § 7.

Publisher's Notes.

Subsection (b) of this section may also apply to §§7-9-104 and7-9-105 as well as to this section.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Current residence” for “Residence” in the form in (a).

7-9-110. Designation of number and popular name.

(a)

The popular name of each state measure shall be the popular name provided by the sponsor under §7-9-107, and the number of the measure on the ballot shall be designated as provided in §7-9-116.

(b)

In all legal notices and publications affecting a measure, the measure shall be identified by both the designated number and popular name.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 71, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 1772, 1773; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-209, 2-214; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 9; 2009, No. 281, § 1; 2013, No. 1413, § 12; 2019, No. 376, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (a)(1).

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “the popular name provided by the sponsor under” for “designated as provided in” in (a).